Nevada, session 83, AB371.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 644A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Cosmetology Licensure Compact is hereby ratified and
entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining the
Compact, in substantially the form set forth in this section:

COSMETOLOGY LICENSURE COMPACT

ARTICLE 1. PURPOSE

The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate the interstate
practice and regulation of Cosmetology with the goal of improving
public access to, and the safety of, Cosmetology Services and
reducing unnecessary burdens related to Cosmetology licensure.
Through this Compact, the Member States seek to establish a
regulatory framework which provides for a new multistate
licensing program. Through this new licensing program, the
Member States seek to provide increased value and mobility to
licensed Cosmetologists in the Member States, while ensuring the
provision of safe, effective, and reliable services to the public.
This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives,
and the Member States hereby ratify the same intentions by
subscribing hereto:
A. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by
Cosmetologists who meet uniform requirements for multistate
licensure;
B. Enhance the abilities of Member States to protect public
health and safety, and prevent fraud and unlicensed activity within
the profession;
-
*AB371*

– 3 –
C. Ensure and encourage cooperation between Member
States in the licensure and regulation of the Practice of
Cosmetology;
D. Support relocating military members and their spouses;
E. Facilitate the exchange of information between Member
States related to the licensure, investigation, and discipline of the
Practice of Cosmetology; and
F. Provide for the licensure and mobility of the workforce in
the profession, while addressing the shortage of workers and
lessening the associated burdens on the Member States.

ARTICLE 2. DEFINITIONS

As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the
following definitions shall govern the terms herein:
A. “Active Military Member” means any person with full-
time duty status in the armed forces of the United States, including
members of the National Guard and Reserve.
B. “Adverse Action” means any administrative, civil,
equitable, or criminal action permitted by a Member State’s laws
which is imposed by a State Licensing Authority or other
regulatory body against a Cosmetologist, including actions against
an individual’s license or Authorization to Practice such as
revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the Licensee,
limitation of the Licensee’s practice, or any other Encumbrance
on a license affecting an individual’s ability to participate in the
Cosmetology industry, including the issuance of a cease and desist
order.
C. “Authorization to Practice” means a legal authorization
associated with a Multistate License permitting the Practice of
Cosmetology in that Remote State, which shall be subject to the
enforcement jurisdiction of the State Licensing Authority in that
Remote State.
D. “Alternative Program” means a non-disciplinary
monitoring or prosecutorial diversion program approved by a
Member State’s State Licensing Authority.
E. “Background Check” means the submission of
information for an applicant for the purpose of obtaining that
applicant’s criminal history record information, as further defined
in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d), from the Federal Bureau of Investigation
and the agency responsible for retaining State criminal or
disciplinary history in the applicant’s Home State.
F. “Charter Member State” means Member States who have
enacted legislation to adopt this Compact where such legislation
predates the effective date of this Compact as defined in Article 13.
-
*AB371*

– 4 –
G. “Commission” means the government agency whose
membership consists of all States that have enacted this Compact,
which is known as the Cosmetology Licensure Compact
Commission, as defined in Article 9, and which shall operate as an
instrumentality of the Member States.
H. “Cosmetologist” means an individual licensed in their
Home State to practice Cosmetology.
I. “Cosmetology”, “Cosmetology Services”, and the “Practice
of Cosmetology” mean the care and services provided by a
Cosmetologist as set forth in the Member State’s statutes and
regulations in the State where the services are being provided.
J. “Current Significant Investigative Information” means:
1. Investigative Information that a State Licensing
Authority, after an inquiry or investigation that complies with a
Member State’s due process requirements, has reason to believe is
not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate a violation of
that State’s laws regarding fraud or the Practice of Cosmetology;
or
2. Investigative Information that indicates that a Licensee
has engaged in fraud or represents an immediate threat to public
health and safety, regardless of whether the Licensee has been
notified and had an opportunity to respond.
K. “Data System” means a repository of information about
Licensees, including, but not limited to, license status,
Investigative Information, and Adverse Actions.
L. “Disqualifying Event” means any event which shall
disqualify an individual from holding a Multistate License under
this Compact, which the Commission may by Rule or order
specify.
M. “Encumbered License” means a license in which an
Adverse Action restricts the Practice of Cosmetology by a
Licensee, or where said Adverse Action has been reported to the
Commission.
N. “Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of, or
any limitation on, the full and unrestricted Practice of
Cosmetology by a State Licensing Authority.
O. “Executive Committee” means a group of delegates
elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers
granted to them by, the Commission.
P. “Home State” means the Member State which is a
Licensee’s primary State of residence, and where that Licensee
holds an active and unencumbered license to practice
Cosmetology.
-
*AB371*

– 5 –
Q. “Investigative Information” means information, records,
or documents received or generated by a State Licensing Authority
pursuant to an investigation or other inquiry.
R. “Jurisprudence Requirement” means the assessment of an
individual’s knowledge of the laws and rules governing the
Practice of Cosmetology in a State.
S. “Licensee” means an individual who currently holds a
license from a Member State to practice as a Cosmetologist.
T. “Member State” means any State that has adopted this
Compact.
U. “Multistate License” means a license issued by and
subject to the enforcement jurisdiction of the State Licensing
Authority in a Licensee’s Home State, which authorizes the
Practice of Cosmetology in Member States and includes
Authorizations to Practice Cosmetology in all Remote States
pursuant to this Compact.
V. “Remote State” means any Member State, other than the
Licensee’s Home State.
W. “Rule” means any rule or regulation promulgated by the
Commission under this Compact which has the force of law.
X. “Single-State License” means a Cosmetology license
issued by a Member State that authorizes practice of Cosmetology
only within the issuing State and does not include any
authorization outside of the issuing State.
Y. “State” means a State, territory, or possession of the
United States and the District of Columbia.
Z. “State Licensing Authority” means a Member State’s
regulatory body responsible for issuing Cosmetology licenses or
otherwise overseeing the Practice of Cosmetology in that State.

ARTICLE 3. MEMBER STATE REQUIREMENTS

A. To be eligible to join this Compact, and to maintain
eligibility as a Member State, a State must:
1. License and regulate Cosmetology;
2. Have a mechanism or entity in place to receive and
investigate complaints about Licensees practicing in that State;
3. Require that Licensees within the State pass a
Cosmetology competency examination prior to being licensed to
provide Cosmetology Services to the public in that State;
4. Require that Licensees satisfy educational or training
requirements in Cosmetology prior to being licensed to provide
Cosmetology Services to the public in that State;
5. Implement procedures for considering one or more of
the following categories of information from applicants for
-
*AB371*

– 6 –
licensure: criminal history; disciplinary history; or Background
Check. Such procedures may include the submission of
information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an
applicant’s Background Check as defined herein;
6. Participate in the Data System, including through the
use of unique identifying numbers;
7. Share information related to Adverse Actions with the
Commission and other Member States, both through the Data
System and otherwise;
8. Notify the Commission and other Member States, in
compliance with the terms of the Compact and Rules of the
Commission, of the existence of Investigative Information or
Current Significant Investigative Information in the State’s
possession regarding a Licensee practicing in that State;
9. Comply with such Rules as may be enacted by the
Commission to administer the Compact; and
10. Accept Licensees from other Member States as
established herein.
B. Member States may charge a fee for granting a license to
practice Cosmetology.
C. Individuals not residing in a Member State shall continue
to be able to apply for a Member State’s Single-State License as
provided under the laws of each Member State. However, the
Single-State License granted to these individuals shall not be
recognized as granting a Multistate License to provide services in
any other Member State.
D. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements
established by a Member State for the issuance of a Single-State
License.
E. A Multistate License issued to a Licensee by a Home State
to a resident of that State shall be recognized by each Member
State as authorizing a Licensee to practice Cosmetology in each
Member State.
F. At no point shall the Commission have the power to define
the educational or professional requirements for a license to
practice Cosmetology. The Member States shall retain sole
jurisdiction over the provision of these requirements.

ARTICLE 4. MULTISTATE LICENSE

A. To be eligible to apply to their Home State’s State
Licensing Authority for an initial Multistate License under this
Compact, a Licensee must hold an active and unencumbered
Single-State License to practice Cosmetology in their Home State.
-
*AB371*

– 7 –
B. Upon the receipt of an application for a Multistate
License, according to the Rules of the Commission, a Member
State’s State Licensing Authority shall ascertain whether the
applicant meets the requirements for a Multistate License under
this Compact.
C. If an applicant meets the requirements for a Multistate
License under this Compact and any applicable Rules of the
Commission, the State Licensing Authority in receipt of the
application shall, within a reasonable time, grant a Multistate
License to that applicant, and inform all Member States of the
grant of said Multistate License.
D. A Multistate License to practice Cosmetology issued by a
Member State’s State Licensing Authority shall be recognized by
each Member State as authorizing the practice thereof as though
that Licensee held a Single-State License to do so in each Member
State, subject to the restrictions herein.
E. A Multistate License granted pursuant to this Compact
may be effective for a definite period of time, concurrent with the
licensure renewal period in the Home State.
F. To maintain a Multistate License under this Compact, a
Licensee must:
1. Agree to abide by the rules of the State Licensing
Authority, and the State scope of practice laws governing the
Practice of Cosmetology, of any Member State in which the
Licensee provides services;
2. Pay all required fees related to the application and
process, and any other fees which the Commission may by Rule
require; and
3. Comply with any and all other requirements regarding
Multistate Licenses which the Commission may by Rule provide.
G. A Licensee practicing in a Member State is subject to all
scope of practice laws governing Cosmetology Services in that
State.
H. The Practice of Cosmetology under a Multistate License
granted pursuant to this Compact will subject the Licensee to the
jurisdiction of the State Licensing Authority, the courts, and the
laws of the Member State in which the Cosmetology Services are
provided.

ARTICLE 5. REISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE
LICENSE BY A NEW HOME STATE

A. A Licensee may hold a Multistate License, issued by their
Home State, in only one Member State at any given time.
-
*AB371*

– 8 –
B. If a Licensee changes their Home State by moving
between two Member States:
1. The Licensee shall immediately apply for the reissuance
of their Multistate License in their new Home State. The Licensee
shall pay all applicable fees and notify the prior Home State in
accordance with the Rules of the Commission.
2. Upon receipt of an application to reissue a Multistate
License, the new Home State shall verify that the Multistate
License is active, unencumbered and eligible for reissuance under
the terms of the Compact and the Rules of the Commission. The
Multistate License issued by the prior Home State will be
deactivated and all Member States notified in accordance with the
applicable Rules adopted by the Commission.
3. If required for initial licensure, the new Home State may
require a Background Check as specified in the laws of that State,
or the compliance with any Jurisprudence Requirements of the
new Home State.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Compact, if
a Licensee does not meet the requirements set forth in this
Compact for the reissuance of a Multistate License by the new
Home State, then the Licensee shall be subject to the new Home
State requirements for the issuance of a Single-State License in
that State.
C. If a Licensee changes their primary state of residence by
moving from a Member State to a non-Member State, or from a
non-Member State to a Member State, then the Licensee shall be
subject to the State requirements for the issuance of a Single-State
License in the new Home State.
D. Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with a Licensee’s
ability to hold a Single-State License in multiple States; however,
for the purposes of this Compact, a Licensee shall have only one
Home State, and only one Multistate License.
E. Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with the
requirements established by a Member State for the issuance of a
Single-State License.

ARTICLE 6. AUTHORITY OF THE COMPACT COMMISSION
AND MEMBER STATE LICENSING AUTHORITIES

A. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule or regulation of
the Commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any way
reduce the ability of a Member State to enact and enforce laws,
regulations, or other rules related to the Practice of Cosmetology
in that State, where those laws, regulations, or other rules are not
inconsistent with the provisions of this Compact.
-
*AB371*

– 9 –
B. Insofar as practical, a Member State’s State Licensing
Authority shall cooperate with the Commission and with each
entity exercising independent regulatory authority over the
Practice of Cosmetology according to the provisions of this
Compact.
C. Discipline shall be the sole responsibility of the State in
which Cosmetology Services are provided. Accordingly, each
Member State’s State Licensing Authority shall be responsible for
receiving complaints about individuals practicing Cosmetology in
that State, and for communicating all relevant Investigative
Information about any such Adverse Action to the other Member
States through the Data System in addition to any other methods
the Commission may by Rule require.

ARTICLE 7. ADVERSE ACTIONS

A. A Licensee’s Home State shall have exclusive power to
impose an Adverse Action against a Licensee’s Multistate License
issued by the Home State.
B. A Home State may take Adverse Action on a Multistate
License based on the Investigative Information, Current
Significant Investigative Information, or Adverse Action of a
Remote State.
C. In addition to the powers conferred by State law, each
Remote State’s State Licensing Authority shall have the power to:
1. Take Adverse Action against a Licensee’s Authorization
to Practice Cosmetology through the Multistate License in that
Member State, provided that:
a. Only the Licensee’s Home State shall have the power
to take Adverse Action against the Multistate License issued by the
Home State; and
b. For the purposes of taking Adverse Action, the Home
State’s State Licensing Authority shall give the same priority and
effect to reported conduct received from a Remote State as it
would if such conduct had occurred within the Home State. In so
doing, the Home State shall apply its own State laws to determine
the appropriate action.
2. Issue cease and desist orders or impose an Encumbrance
on a Licensee’s Authorization to Practice within that Member
State.
3. Complete any pending investigations of a Licensee who
changes their primary state of residence during the course of such
an investigation. The State Licensing Authority shall also be
empowered to report the results of such an investigation to the
Commission through the Data System as described herein.
-
*AB371*

– 10 –
4. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations
that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses, as well as
the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a State Licensing
Authority in a Member State for the attendance and testimony of
witnesses or the production of evidence from another Member
State shall be enforced in the latter State by any court of
competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of
that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings before it.
The issuing State Licensing Authority shall pay any witness fees,
travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service
statutes of the State in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
5. If otherwise permitted by State law, recover from the
affected Licensee the costs of investigations and disposition of
cases resulting from any Adverse Action taken against that
Licensee.
6. Take Adverse Action against the Licensee’s
Authorization to Practice in that State based on the factual
findings of another Remote State.
D. A Licensee’s Home State shall complete any pending
investigation(s) of a Cosmetologist who changes their primary
state of residence during the course of the investigation(s). The
Home State shall also have the authority to take appropriate
action(s) and shall promptly report the conclusions of the
investigations to the Data System.
E. If an Adverse Action is taken by the Home State against a
Licensee’s Multistate License, the Licensee’s Authorization to
Practice in all other Member States shall be deactivated until all
Encumbrances have been removed from the Home State license.
All Home State disciplinary orders that impose an Adverse Action
against a Licensee’s Multistate License shall include a statement
that the Cosmetologist’s Authorization to Practice is deactivated in
all Member States during the pendency of the order.
F. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Member State’s
authority to accept a Licensee’s participation in an Alternative
Program in lieu of Adverse Action. A Licensee’s Multistate
License shall be suspended for the duration of the Licensee’s
participation in any Alternative Program.
G. Joint Investigations
1. In addition to the authority granted to a Member State by
its respective scope of practice laws or other applicable State law, a
Member State may participate with other Member States in joint
investigations of Licensees.
2. Member States shall share any investigative, litigation, or
compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual
investigation initiated under the Compact.
-
*AB371*

– 11 –
ARTICLE 8. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS
AND THEIR SPOUSES

Active Military Members, or their spouses, shall designate a
Home State where the individual has a current license to practice
Cosmetology in good standing. The individual may retain their
Home State designation during any period of service when that
individual or their spouse is on active duty assignment.

ARTICLE 9. ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF THE
COSMETOLOGY LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION

A. The Compact Member States hereby create and establish a
joint government agency whose membership consists of all
Member States that have enacted the Compact known as the
Cosmetology Licensure Compact Commission. The Commission is
an instrumentality of the Compact Member States acting jointly
and not an instrumentality of any one State. The Commission
shall come into existence on or after the effective date of the
Compact as set forth in Article 13.
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each Member State shall have and be limited to one (1)
delegate selected by that Member State’s State Licensing
Authority.
2. The delegate shall be an administrator of the State
Licensing Authority of the Member State or their designee.
3. The Commission shall by Rule or bylaw establish a term
of office for delegates and may by Rule or bylaw establish term
limits.
4. The Commission may recommend removal or suspension
of any delegate from office.
5. A Member State’s State Licensing Authority shall fill any
vacancy of its delegate occurring on the Commission within 60
days of the vacancy.
6. Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters
that are voted on by the Commission.
7. The Commission shall meet at least once during each
calendar year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the
bylaws. The Commission may meet by telecommunication, video
conference or other similar electronic means.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest
policies;
3. Adopt Rules and bylaws;
-
*AB371*

– 12 –
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the
bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the
provisions of this Compact, the Commission’s Rules, and the
bylaws;
6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the
name of the Commission, provided that the standing of any State
Licensing Authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall
not be affected;
7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to
a Member State as the authenticated business records of the
Commission, and designate an agent to do so on the Commission’s
behalf;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel,
including, but not limited to, employees of a Member State;
10. Conduct an annual financial review;
11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix
compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate
authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact, and establish
the Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to
conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related
personnel matters;
12. As set forth in the Commission Rules, charge a fee to a
Licensee for the grant of a Multistate License and thereafter, as
may be established by Commission Rule, charge the Licensee a
Multistate License renewal fee for each renewal period. Nothing
herein shall be construed to prevent a Home State from charging
a Licensee a fee for a Multistate License or renewals of a
Multistate License, or a fee for the jurisprudence requirement if
the Member State imposes such a requirement for the grant of a
Multistate License;
13. Assess and collect fees;
14. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants
of money, other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies,
materials, and services, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the
same; provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid any
appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;
15. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any
property, real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest
therein;
16. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange,
abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or
mixed;
17. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
-
*AB371*

– 13 –
18. Borrow money;
19. Appoint committees, including standing committees,
composed of members, State regulators, State legislators or their
representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other
interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the
bylaws;
20. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate
with, law enforcement agencies;
21. Elect a Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer and
such other officers of the Commission as provided in the
Commission’s bylaws;
22. Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including
a chair and a vice chair;
23. Adopt and provide to the Member States an annual
report;
24. Determine whether a State’s adopted language is
materially different from the model Compact language such that
the State would not qualify for participation in the Compact; and
25. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact.
D. The Executive Committee
1. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on
behalf of the Commission according to the terms of this Compact.
The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Executive
Committee shall include:
a. Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the
administration of the Compact including compliance with the
provisions of the Compact, the Commission’s Rules and bylaws,
and other such duties as deemed necessary;
b. Recommending to the Commission changes to the
Rules or bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, fees charged
to Compact Member States, fees charged to Licensees, and other
fees;
c. Ensuring Compact administration services are
appropriately provided, including by contract;
d. Preparing and recommending the budget;
e. Maintaining financial records on behalf of the
Commission;
f. Monitoring Compact compliance of Member States
and providing compliance reports to the Commission;
g. Establishing additional committees as necessary;
h. Exercising the powers and duties of the Commission
during the interim between Commission meetings, except for
adopting or amending Rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and
-
*AB371*

– 14 –
exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the
Commission by Rule or bylaw; and
i. Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the
Commission.
2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of up to
seven voting members:
a. The chair and vice chair of the Commission and any
other members of the Commission who serve on the Executive
Committee shall be voting members of the Executive Committee;
b. Other than the chair, vice-chair, secretary and
treasurer, the Commission shall elect three voting members from
the current membership of the Commission; and
c. The Commission may elect ex-officio, nonvoting
members from a recognized national Cosmetology professional
association as approved by the Commission. The Commission’s
bylaws shall identify qualifying organizations and the manner of
appointment if the number of organizations seeking to appoint an
ex officio member exceeds the number of members specified in
this Article.
3. The Commission may remove any member of the
Executive Committee as provided in the Commission’s bylaws.
4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
a. Annual Executive Committee meetings, as well as any
Executive Committee meeting at which it does not take or intend
to take formal action on a matter for which a Commission vote
would otherwise be required, shall be open to the public, except
that the Executive Committee may meet in a closed, non-public
session of a public meeting when dealing with any of the matters
covered under Article 9.F.4.
b. The Executive Committee shall give five business
days advance notice of its public meetings, posted on its website
and as determined to provide notice to persons with an interest in
the public matters the Executive Committee intends to address at
those meetings.
5. The Executive Committee may hold an emergency
meeting when acting for the Commission to:
a. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or
welfare;
b. Prevent a loss of Commission or Member State funds;
or
c. Protect public health and safety.
E. The Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member
States an annual report.
F. Meetings of the Commission
-
*AB371*

– 15 –
1. All meetings of the Commission that are not closed
pursuant to Article 9.F.4 shall be open to the public. Notice of
public meetings shall be posted on the Commission’s website at
least thirty (30) days prior to the public meeting.
2. Notwithstanding Article 9.F.1, the Commission may
convene an emergency public meeting by providing at least
twenty-four (24) hours prior notice on the Commission’s website,
and any other means as provided in the Commission’s Rules, for
any of the reasons it may dispense with notice of proposed
rulemaking under Article 11.L. The Commission’s legal counsel
shall certify that one of the reasons justifying an emergency public
meeting has been met.
3. Notice of all Commission meetings shall provide the
time, date, and location of the meeting, and if the meeting is to be
held or accessible via telecommunication, video conference, or
other electronic means, the notice shall include the mechanism for
access to the meeting.
4. The Commission may convene in a closed, non-public
meeting for the Commission to discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a Member State with its
obligations under the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or
other matters related to the Commission’s internal personnel
practices and procedures;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee by the
Commission or by a Member State’s Licensing Authority;
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or
sale of goods, services, or real estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information
that is privileged or confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure
would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal
privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement
purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports
prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the Commission or other
committee charged with responsibility of investigation or
determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact;
k. Legal advice;
-
*AB371*

– 16 –
l. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure to the
public by federal or Member State law; or
m. Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by
Rule.
5. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the
presiding officer shall state that the meeting will be closed and
reference each relevant exempting provision, and such reference
shall be recorded in the minutes.
6. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and
clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall
provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the
reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed.
All documents considered in connection with an action shall be
identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed
meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a
majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
G. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment
of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and
ongoing activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate
sources of revenue, donations, and grants of money, equipment,
supplies, materials, and services.
3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual
assessment from each Member State and impose fees on Licensees
of Member States to whom it grants a Multistate License to cover
the cost of the operations and activities of the Commission and its
staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its
annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not
provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment
amount for Member States shall be allocated based upon a
formula that the Commission shall promulgate by Rule.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind
prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall
the Commission pledge the credit of any Member States, except by
and with the authority of the Member State.
5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all
receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the
Commission shall be subject to the financial review and
accounting procedures established under its bylaws. All receipts
and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission shall be
subject to an annual financial review by a certified or licensed
public accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be
-
*AB371*

– 17 –
included in and become part of the annual report of the
Commission.
H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for any
claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other
civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act,
error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom
the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be
construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any
damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The procurement of
insurance of any type by the Commission shall not in any way
compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer,
executive director, employee, and representative of the
Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising
out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, or as determined by the Commission that the
person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment,
duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be
construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own counsel
at their own expense; and provided further, that the actual or
alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any
member, officer, executive director, employee, and representative
of the Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment
obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such
person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities,
provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not
result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the
liability of any Licensee for professional malpractice or
misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other
applicable State laws.
-
*AB371*

– 18 –
5. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or
otherwise abrogate a Member State’s State action immunity or
State action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims
under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or federal
antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
6. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a
waiver of sovereign immunity by the Member States or by the
Commission.

ARTICLE 10. DATA SYSTEM

A. The Commission shall provide for the development,
maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated database
and reporting system.
B. The Commission shall assign each applicant for a
Multistate License a unique identifier, as determined by the Rules
of the Commission.
C. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the
contrary, a Member State shall submit a uniform data set to the
Data System on all individuals to whom this Compact is applicable
as required by the Rules of the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse Actions against a license and information
related thereto;
4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative
Program participation, the beginning and ending dates of such
participation, and other information related to such participation;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s)
for such denial (excluding the reporting of any criminal history
record information where prohibited by law);
6. The existence of Investigative Information;
7. The existence of Current Significant Investigative
Information; and
8. Other information that may facilitate the administration
of this Compact or the protection of the public, as determined by
the Rules of the Commission.
D. The records and information provided to a Member State
pursuant to this Compact or through the Data System, when
certified by the Commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute
the authenticated business records of the Commission, and shall
be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant
judicial, quasi-judicial or administrative proceedings in a Member
State.
-
*AB371*

– 19 –
E. The existence of Current Significant Investigative
Information and the existence of Investigative Information
pertaining to a Licensee in any Member State will only be
available to other Member States.
F. It is the responsibility of the Member States to monitor the
database to determine whether Adverse Action has been taken
against such a Licensee or License applicant. Adverse Action
information pertaining to a Licensee or License applicant in any
Member State will be available to any other Member State.
G. Member States contributing information to the Data
System may designate information that may not be shared with the
public without the express permission of the contributing State.
H. Any information submitted to the Data System that is
subsequently expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the
Member State contributing the information shall be removed from
the Data System.

ARTICLE 11. RULEMAKING

A. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in
order to effectively and efficiently implement and administer the
purposes and provisions of the Compact. A Rule shall be invalid
and have no force or effect only if a court of competent
jurisdiction holds that the Rule is invalid because the Commission
exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the
scope and purposes of the Compact, or the powers granted
hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
B. The Rules of the Commission shall have the force of law
in each Member State, provided however that where the Rules of
the Commission conflict with the laws of the Member State that
establish the Member State’s scope of practice laws governing the
Practice of Cosmetology as held by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the Rules of the Commission shall be ineffective in
that State to the extent of the conflict.
C. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers
pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Article and the Rules
adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding as of the date
specified by the Commission for each Rule.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States
rejects a Rule or portion of a Rule, by enactment of a statute or
resolution in the same manner used to adopt the Compact within
four (4) years of the date of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule
shall have no further force and effect in any Member State or to
any State applying to participate in the Compact.
-
*AB371*

– 20 –
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of
the Commission.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission
shall hold a public hearing and allow persons to provide oral and
written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments.
G. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Commission,
and at least thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at which the
Commission will hold a public hearing on the proposed Rule, the
Commission shall provide a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly
accessible platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice of the
Commission’s notices of proposed rulemaking; and
3. In such other way(s) as the Commission may by Rule
specify.
H. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at
which the Commission will hear public comments on the proposed
Rule and, if different, the time, date, and location of the meeting
where the Commission will consider and vote on the proposed
Rule;
2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video
conference, or other electronic means, the Commission shall
include the mechanism for access to the hearing in the notice of
proposed rulemaking;
3. The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefor;
4. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any
interested person; and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit
written comments.
I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and
all written comments and documents received by the Commission
in response to the proposed Rule shall be available to the public.
J. Nothing in this Article shall be construed as requiring a
separate hearing on each Rule. Rules may be grouped for the
convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this
Article.
K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members,
take final action on the proposed Rule based on the rulemaking
record and the full text of the Rule.
1. The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed
Rule provided the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of
the proposed Rule.
2. The Commission shall provide an explanation of the
reasons for substantive changes made to the proposed Rule as well
-
*AB371*

– 21 –
as reasons for substantive changes not made that were
recommended by commenters.
3. The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective
date for the Rule. Except for an emergency as provided in Article
11.L, the effective date of the Rule shall be no sooner than forty-
five (45) days after the Commission issuing the notice that it
adopted or amended the Rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the
Commission may consider and adopt an emergency Rule with five
(5) days’ notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that the
usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in this
Article shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as
reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after
the effective date of the Rule. For the purposes of this provision,
an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted immediately to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or
welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or Member State funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is
established by federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the
Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted Rule for
purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format,
errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any
revisions shall be posted on the website of the Commission. The
revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of
thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be challenged only
on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a
Rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the
Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge
is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the
revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the
approval of the Commission.
N. No Member State’s rulemaking requirements shall apply
under this Compact.

ARTICLE 12. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION,
AND ENFORCEMENT

A. Oversight
1. The executive and judicial branches of State government
in each Member State shall enforce this Compact and take all
actions necessary and appropriate to implement the Compact.
-
*AB371*

– 22 –
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against
the Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court
of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the
Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to
participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing
herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in
any action against a Licensee for professional malpractice,
misconduct or any such similar matter.
3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of
process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or
interpretation of the Compact and shall have standing to intervene
in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the
Commission service of process shall render a judgment or order
void as to the Commission, this Compact, or promulgated Rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a Member State has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities
under this Compact or the promulgated Rules, the Commission
shall provide written notice to the defaulting State. The notice of
default shall describe the default, the proposed means of curing
the default, and any other action that the Commission may take,
and shall offer training and specific technical assistance
regarding the default.
2. The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of
default to the other Member States.
3. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the
defaulting State may be terminated from the Compact upon an
affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of the Member
States, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred on that
State by this Compact may be terminated on the effective date of
termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending
State of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of
default.
4. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be
imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have
been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be
given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and
minority leaders of the defaulting State’s legislature, the
defaulting State’s State Licensing Authority and each of the
Member States’ State Licensing Authority.
5. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the
effective date of termination, including obligations that extend
beyond the effective date of termination.
-
*AB371*

– 23 –
6. Upon the termination of a State’s membership from this
Compact, that State shall immediately provide notice to all
Licensees who hold a Multistate License within that State of such
termination. The terminated State shall continue to recognize all
licenses granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of one
hundred eighty (180) days after the date of said notice of
termination.
7. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a
State that is found to be in default or that has been terminated
from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the
Commission and the defaulting State.
8. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the
Commission by petitioning the United States District Court for the
District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission
has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
C. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a Member State, the Commission shall
attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise
among Member States and between Member and non-Member
States.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for
both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as
appropriate.
D. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its
discretion, shall enforce the provisions of this Compact and the
Commission’s Rules.
2. By majority vote as provided by Commission Rule, the
Commission may initiate legal action against a Member State in
default in the United States District Court for the District of
Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the
Compact and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may
include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial
enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees. The
remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the
Commission. The Commission may pursue any other remedies
available under federal or the defaulting Member State’s law.
3. A Member State may initiate legal action against the
Commission in the United States District Court for the District of
Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the
Compact and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may
-
*AB371*

– 24 –
include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial
enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
4. No individual or entity other than a Member State may
enforce this Compact against the Commission.

ARTICLE 13. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL,
AND AMENDMENT

A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which
the Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh Member
State.
1. On or after the effective date of the Compact, the
Commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of
the Charter Member States to determine if the statute enacted by
each such Charter Member State is materially different than the
model Compact statute.
a. A Charter Member State whose enactment is found to
be materially different from the model Compact statute shall be
entitled to the default process set forth in Article 12.
b. If any Member State is later found to be in default, or
is terminated or withdraws from the Compact, the Commission
shall remain in existence and the Compact shall remain in effect
even if the number of Member States should be less than
seven (7).
2. Member States enacting the Compact subsequent to the
Charter Member States shall be subject to the process set forth in
Article 9.C.24 to determine if their enactments are materially
different from the model Compact statute and whether they qualify
for participation in the Compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the Compact
prior to the effective date of the Compact or the Commission
coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the
Commission unless specifically repudiated by the Commission.
4. Any State that joins the Compact shall be subject to the
Commission’s Rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which
the Compact becomes law in that State. Any Rule that has been
previously adopted by the Commission shall have the full force
and effect of law on the day the Compact becomes law in that
State.
B. Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by
enacting a statute repealing that State’s enactment of the
Compact.
-
*AB371*

– 25 –
1. A Member State’s withdrawal shall not take effect until
one hundred eighty (180) days after enactment of the repealing
statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement
of the withdrawing State’s State Licensing Authority to comply
with the investigative and Adverse Action reporting requirements
of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this
Compact, a State shall immediately provide notice of such
withdrawal to all Licensees within that State. Notwithstanding any
subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing
State shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to
this Compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days
after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
C. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to
invalidate or prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative
arrangement between a Member State and a non-Member State
that does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
D. This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No
amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding
upon any Member State until it is enacted into the laws of all
Member States.

ARTICLE 14. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

A. This Compact and the Commission’s rulemaking authority
shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and
the implementation and administration of the Compact. Provisions
of the Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the
promulgation of Rules shall not be construed to limit the
Commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if
any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this Compact is held
by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the
constitution of any Member State, a State seeking participation in
the Compact, or of the United States, or the applicability thereof to
any government, agency, person or circumstance is held to be
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity
of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof to
any other government, agency, person or circumstance shall not
be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding Article 14.B, the Commission may deny a
State’s participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the
requirements of Article 12, terminate a Member State’s
participation in the Compact, if it determines that a constitutional
-
*AB371*

– 26 –
requirement of a Member State is a material departure from the
Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be contrary
to the constitution of any Member State, the Compact shall remain
in full force and effect as to the remaining Member States and in
full force and effect as to the Member State affected as to all
severable matters.

ARTICLE 15. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND
CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS

A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of
any other law of a Member State that is not inconsistent with the
Compact.
B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements
in a Member State in conflict with the Compact are superseded to
the extent of the conflict.
C. All permissible agreements between the Commission and
the Member States are binding in accordance with their terms.
Sec. 2. NRS 644A.870 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.870 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 239.0115, and section 1 of this act, a complaint filed with the
Board, all documents and other information filed with the complaint
and all documents and other information compiled as a result of an
investigation conducted to determine whether to initiate disciplinary
action against a person are confidential.
2. The charging document filed with the Board to initiate
disciplinary action pursuant to chapter 622A of NRS and all
documents and information considered by the Board when
determining whether to impose discipline are public records.
3. The Board shall, to the extent feasible, communicate or
cooperate with or provide any documents or other information to
any other licensing board or any other agency that is investigating a
person, including, without limitation, a law enforcement agency.
Sec. 3. The preliminary chapter of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
Except as otherwise expressly provided in a particular statute
or required by the context, authorization to practice as a
cosmetologist in this State under a multistate license issued under
the Cosmetology Licensure Compact ratified and entered into in
section 1 of this act shall be deemed to be equivalent to the
corresponding license.
Sec. 4. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
-
*AB371*

– 27 –
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
-
*AB371*

– 28 –
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 1 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter
478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes
of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
-
*AB371*

– 29 –
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
-
*AB371*

– 30 –
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 5. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB371*